Tennessee, session 114, HB0488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-506(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "ninety (90) calendar days" and substituting "sixty (60) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0488
001800
- 1 -